California, session 20252026, AB1068.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 9114.5 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:9114.5. (a) No later than January 1, July 1, 2026, the Secretary of the California Health and Human Services Agency shall develop a working group to make recommendations regarding the best policies and practices for the evacuation and sheltering needs of older adults and persons with disabilities living in long-term care facilities during emergencies, including, but not limited to, mutual aid evacuations, in coordination with all of the following:(1) The California Department of Aging.(2) The California Department of Rehabilitation.(3) The Emergency Medical Services Authority.(4) The Office of Emergency Services.(5) The Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman.(6) The State Department of Public Health.(7) The State Department of Social Services.(8) Stakeholders representing long-term care facility operators, staff, and residents, local government, foundations, and academic researchers.(b) No later than July 1, 2026, 2027, the Secretary of the California Health and Human Services Agency shall submit the recommendations of the workgroup to the Office of the Governor and to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the identification of statutory and regulatory changes that are needed to implement the evacuation and sheltering needs of older adults and persons with disabilities living in long-term care facilities.(c)  Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2030.